Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.810

Inspection or grading of commodities—Inspection of commodities shipped to or from places other than inspection points.

In case any commodity under the provisions of this chapter is sold for delivery on Washington grade to be shipped to or from places not provided with state inspection under this chapter, the buyer, seller, or persons making delivery may have it inspected by notifying the department or its inspectors, whose duty it shall be to have such commodity inspected, and after it is inspected, to issue to the buyer, seller, or person delivering it, without undue delay, a certificate showing the grade of such commodity. The person or persons, or his or her agent, calling for such inspection shall pay for such inspection a reasonable fee to be fixed by the department.

[ 2011 c 336 s 647; 1963 c 124 s 48. Formerly RCW 22.09.480.]